New York, session 2025-2026, S4072.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (A) of paragraph 11 of subsection (l) of 2 section 3221 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws 3 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 4 (A) Every insurer delivering a group or blanket policy or issuing a 5 group or blanket policy for delivery in this state that provides cover- 6 age for hospital, surgical or medical care shall provide the following 7 coverage for mammography screening for occult breast cancer: 8 (i) upon the recommendation of a physician, a mammogram, which may be 9 provided by breast tomosynthesis, at any age for covered persons having 10 a prior history of breast cancer or who have a first degree relative 11 with a prior history of breast cancer; 12 (ii) a single baseline mammogram, which may be provided by breast 13 tomosynthesis, for covered persons aged thirty-five through thirty-nine, 14 inclusive, and a single baseline mammogram, which may be provided by 15 breast tomosynthesis, for all other covered persons upon the recommenda- 16 tion of a physician, subject to the insurer's determination that the 17 mammogram is medically necessary; 18 (iii) an annual mammogram, which may be provided by breast tomosynthe- 19 sis, for covered persons aged forty and older; 20 (iv) for large group policies that provide coverage for hospital, 21 surgical or medical care, an annual mammogram for all covered persons 22 aged thirty-five through thirty-nine, inclusive and all covered persons EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01242-06-5 S. 4072--A 2 1 having a prior history of breast cancer or who have a first degree rela- 2 tive with a prior history of breast cancer, and any sonogram or other 3 diagnostic procedure used to detect breast cancer, upon the recommenda- 4 tion of a physician, subject to the insurer's determination that the 5 mammogram is medically necessary; and 6 (v) upon the recommendation of a physician, screening and diagnostic 7 imaging, including diagnostic mammograms, breast ultrasounds, or magnet- 8 ic resonance imaging, recommended by nationally recognized clinical 9 practice guidelines for the detection of breast cancer. For the purposes 10 of this item, "nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines" means 11 evidence-based clinical practice guidelines informed by a systematic 12 review of evidence and an assessment of the benefits, and risks of 13 alternative care options intended to optimize patient care developed by 14 independent organizations or medical professional societies utilizing a 15 transparent methodology and reporting structure and with a conflict of 16 interest policy. 17 § 2. Subparagraph (D) of paragraph 1 of subsection (p) of section 4303 18 of the insurance law, as amended by chapter 424 of the laws of 2024, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 (D) for large group contracts offered by a medical expense indemnity 21 corporation, a hospital service corporation or a health service corpo- 22 ration that provide coverage for hospital, surgical or medical care, an 23 annual mammogram for all covered persons aged thirty-five through thir- 24 ty-nine, inclusive, and all covered persons having a prior history of 25 breast cancer or who have a first degree relative with a prior history 26 of breast cancer, and for all covered persons any sonogram or other 27 diagnostic procedure used to detect breast cancer, upon the recommenda- 28 tion of a physician, subject to the corporation's determination that the 29 mammogram is medically necessary; 30 § 3. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 31 manner as chapter 424 of the laws of 2024, takes effect.